Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

Special Medical Procedure Rules

33-8-301. Electroconvulsive therapy upon child prohibited except under this part.

No person or facility may administer electroconvulsive therapy or other convulsive therapy to a child except as authorized under this part under §§ 33-8-302 and 33-8-303 or under §§ 33-8-305—33-8-313.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Prior to the deletion and replacement of chapter 8 in the revision of title 33, by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001, former chapter 8, parts 1-5, were transferred to title 68, ch. 24, parts 1-5, respectively, in 1993. See the Compiler's Notes under § 68-24-101.

Collateral References.

Jurisdiction of court to permit sterilization of mentally defective person in absence of specific statutory authority. 74 A.L.R.3d 1210.

Power of parent to have mentally defective child sterilized. 74 A.L.R.3d 1224.

33-8-302. Electroconvulsive therapy — When authorized for child with mania or severe depression.

IF AND ONLY IF

a child has mania or severe depression, AND

all other accepted methods of therapy have been exhausted, OR

electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy is necessary to save the child's life due to potential suicide, or to prevent irreparable injury resulting from conditions such as starvation, dehydration, or physical exhaustion bordering on serious collapse to the extent the conditions are life threatening, AND

the service provider to perform the therapy has convened a multi-disciplinary review team of at least five (5) persons, at least one (1) of whom is independent of the service provider, AND

the multi-disciplinary review team has approved the electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy, AND

an American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology certified psychiatrist, who is child and adolescent certified, approves the therapy,

THEN

the approved convulsive therapy may be necessary for the child for purposes of this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-303. Electroconvulsive therapy — When authorized for child over fourteen (14) years of age.

IF AND ONLY IF

a child is fourteen (14) years of age or older, AND

the approved convulsive therapy may be necessary for the child as determined under § 33-8-302, AND

a second American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology certified psychiatrist approves the procedure, AND

the child does not object to the electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy after being informed of the proposed therapy and alternatives, AND

at least one (1) parent who has custody of the child or the child's legal guardian consents, AND

no parent objects to the therapy,

THEN

the child may be treated with the approved convulsive therapy under authority of this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-304. Electroconvulsive therapy — When authorized for child in state custody.

If a child is in state custody and a convulsive therapy may be necessary for the child as determined under § 33-8-302, the therapy shall not be performed unless the commissioner of children's services obtains authority under §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313. A child in state custody may not be provided convulsive therapy under § 33-8-309.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-305. Electroconvulsive therapy upon child — Court approval or finding of emergency required.

No mental health professional, hospital, treatment resource, or other person or facility may administer electroconvulsive therapy or other form of convulsive therapy to any person under eighteen (18) years of age under this section and §§ 33-8-306 — 33-8-313, except:

Upon prior written authorization by a court based upon a hearing at which it is shown that the approved convulsive therapy may be necessary for the child as determined under § 33-8-302 and is necessary in light of all evidence presented at the hearing; or

Emergency treatment under § 33-8-309.

In all cases under this section and §§ 33-8-306 — 33-8-313, the court shall appoint for the child a guardian ad litem who is not the child's attorney.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-306. Electroconvulsive therapy — Commitment proceedings pending.

If proceedings for the child's commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title are pending, the hearing to determine the necessity of administering convulsive therapy may be held only after adequate written notice has been given to the child, the child's legal guardian, and the child's attorney informing them of the nature of the therapy sought and the facts upon which the claim is based that the therapy is necessary for the child's health or safety. The hearing may either be consolidated with the hearing for the child's commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, or may be convened at another time.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-307. Electroconvulsive therapy — Hearing in juvenile court.

If no proceedings for the child's commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title are pending, the hearing to determine the necessity of administering electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy shall be convened in the juvenile court where the child resides, was committed to state custody, or may be found upon petition of the child, the child's parent, the legal guardian, a mental health professional, hospital, or treatment resource seeking authorization to administer the therapy. The petition shall be verified and shall state the nature of the therapy for which authorization is sought, and the facts upon which the petitioner relies to support the claim that the therapy is necessary for the child's health or safety. The court shall, upon receipt of the petition, appoint counsel to defend against the petition, and the petition shall be served personally upon both the child and the child's attorney.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-308. Electroconvulsive therapy upon child — Independent psychiatric evaluation required.

Whenever authorization is sought for the administration to a child of electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy, the court shall appoint an independent psychiatrist who shall receive reimbursement in an amount fixed by the court. No electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy may be authorized for a child except upon the testimony of an independent psychiatrist, who is child and adolescent certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, that the psychiatrist has examined the child and is of the opinion that the therapy is necessary for the child's health or safety.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-309. Electroconvulsive therapy — Petition to court.

Electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy may be initiated prior to a court hearing under §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313, if the petitioner files a petition with the court having jurisdiction of the child's commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title, if the proceeding is pending, or otherwise files a petition in the juvenile court where the child resides, was committed to state custody, or may be found.

The petition shall be verified by the mental health professional, hospital or treatment resource seeking authorization to administer the therapy and shall state the nature of the therapy for which authorization is sought, and the facts upon which the petitioner relies to support the claim that it has been determined under § 33-8-302 that the convulsive therapy may be necessary for the child.

Attached to the petition shall be an affidavit from a child psychiatrist, who shall be child and adolescent certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, stating that:

It has been determined under § 33-8-302 that the convulsive therapy may be necessary for the child; and

There is insufficient time to complete the procedure provided by §§ 33-8-305—33-8-313, and therefore treatment prior to a court hearing is necessary.

The affidavit shall provide the specific factual, medical and clinical basis supporting the requirements of this section.

The child psychiatrist shall personally examine the child within twenty-four (24) hours of the filing of the petition.

The child psychiatrist shall not be in a professional practice or association with the attending physician, nor have any direct financial interest in any private hospital or treatment resource in which the child is to be detained or receive therapy.

If the petition and affidavit have been filed in conformity with this section, electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy may be initiated. Electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy shall be discontinued immediately when any of the conditions required under §§ 33-8-302(1) and (2) and 33-8- 303(1) that justified the therapy are no longer true.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(g)(1), (2); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-310. Counsel required for hearing.

The court hearing upon a petition under §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313 shall be held within seven (7) calendar days of the filing of the petition. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the child at the hearings, unless the child already has an attorney due to a pending commitment under chapter 6, part 5 of this title. The petition shall be served personally upon both the child and the child's attorney.

The child's attorney shall not in any case be a person who has previously advised the parties seeking authorization to administer electroconvulsive therapy or other convulsive therapy, nor shall the attorney be a person who has previously advised the child's parents, the parent's business, the child's legal guardian, or the legal guardian's business.

The court-appointed independent psychiatrist or the child psychiatrist whose affidavit accompanied a petition filed under § 33-8-309 shall be a witness at the hearing. The child psychiatrist's testimony may be used in place of a court-appointed independent psychiatrist. The psychiatrist's testimony shall not be regarded as conclusive, and the court shall consider any other evidence, including other expert testimony, offered in opposition to the authorization of the therapy.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(d), (g)(3); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-311. Conduct of hearing.

At the hearing the court shall determine:

If therapy was administered under § 33-8-309, whether retrospectively all of the standards for initiating therapy under § 33-8-309 prior to a court hearing were fully complied with, and if not, which standards were not met; and

Whether prospectively electroconvulsive or other convulsive therapy is necessary for the child's health or safety.

Nothing in §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313 shall be construed to modify or alter §§ 33-8-315 or 33-8-316.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(g)(4), (5); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-312. Hearing costs.

Under §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313, if the child is indigent and is not in the custody of the department of children's services, the department shall reimburse the attorney for the petitioner, the attorney and the guardian ad litem appointed by the court for the child, and the psychiatrist who testifies at the hearing, whether the board-certified child psychiatrist under § 33-8-309 or the court-appointed independent psychiatrist under § 33-8-308, in an amount fixed by the court. The department shall pay all court costs under §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313 if the child is indigent and is not in the custody of the department of children's services.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(i); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-8-313. Appeal.

Any decision of the court under §§ 33-8-305 — 33-8-313 shall be reviewable de novo upon expedited appeal to the circuit court, and the decision of the court from which an appeal is taken shall be stayed pending disposition of the appeal in circuit court.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(e); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-314. Report on use of convulsive therapies.

The department shall report annually to the statewide planning and policy council on the use of electroconvulsive and other convulsive therapies.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-8-315. Lobotomies upon children prohibited.

Lobotomies for intervention or alteration of a mental, emotional or behavioral disorder shall not be performed on children, and the courts of this state are prohibited from ordering or authorizing the performance of the procedure upon any child.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(f); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-8-316. Child's rights not to be waived.

A child may not waive any right created by this part, nor may the right be waived by any other person acting on the child's behalf.

Acts 1976, ch. 489, § 1; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-320, 33-3-201(h); Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.